Georgia statutes. TITLE 46 Public Utilities and Public Transportation
PART 2 Corporate Purposes and Powers

46-3-200.
Purposes of electric membership corporations.

An electric membership corporation may serve any one or more of the following purposes:

Furnish electrical energy and service;

Assist its members in the efficient and economical use of energy;

Engage in research and promote and develop energy conservation and sources and methods of conserving, producing, converting, and delivering energy;

Provide and operate broadband facilities and provide and use the broadband services described in subparagraphs (A) and (B) of paragraph (8.1) of Code Section 46-3-171;

Furnish on a nondiscriminatory basis the broadband services described in subparagraphs (C) and (D) of paragraph (8.1) of Code Section 46-3-171;

Form, fund, support, and operate a broadband affiliate, directly or indirectly, contingent upon compliance with Code Sections 46-5-163 and 46-3-200.2; and

Engage in any lawful act or activity necessary or convenient to effect the foregoing purposes.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 3; Code 1933, § 34C-201, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 2019, p. 226, § 2/SB 2.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 26, 2019, rewrote this Code section, which read: “An electric membership corporation may serve any one or more of the following purposes:

“(1) To furnish electrical energy and service;

“(2) To assist its members in the efficient and economical use of energy;

“(3) To engage in research and to promote and develop energy conservation and sources and methods of conserving, producing, converting, and delivering energy; and

“(4) To engage in any lawful act or activity necessary or convenient to effect the foregoing purposes.”

46-3-200.1.
Authorized acts of electric membership corporation or broadband affiliate.

In order to assist a broadband affiliate in the planning, engineering, construction, extension, provision, operation, repair, and maintenance of broadband services, an electric membership corporation or its broadband affiliate shall be authorized to:

Apply for, accept, repay, and utilize loans, grants, and other financing from any person; and

Enter into contracts, agreements, partnerships, or other types of business relationships with any person.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-200.1

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 226, § 3/SB 2.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 26, 2019.

46-3-200.2.
Cross-subsidization; jurisdiction over compliance with the cross-subsidization prohibitions; expedited adjudication.

No electric membership corporation, broadband affiliate, or gas affiliate shall permit cross-subsidization between its electricity services activities, its broadband services activities, or its gas activities. To prevent cross-subsidization between broadband services activities and gas activities and between broadband services activities and electricity services activities, any electric membership corporation with a broadband affiliate that provides retail broadband services shall:

Fully allocate all costs of electricity services activities and broadband services activities, including costs of any shared services, between electricity services activities and such broadband affiliate’s broadband services activities, in accordance with:

The provisions of this Code section; and

The applicable uniform system of accounts and generally accepted accounting principles that are applicable to electric membership corporations under federal and state laws, rules, and regulations;

Not charge any costs of electricity services activities or gas activities to the broadband services customers of the broadband affiliate;

Not charge any costs of broadband services activities to the electricity services customers of such electric membership corporation or to the gas activities customers of its gas affiliate; and

Not use below-market loans or below-market funding from programs that are not intended to support the deployment of broadband facilities or broadband services in order to support broadband facilities or to provide broadband services unless the electric membership corporation or its broadband affiliate imputes the difference between market rates and the below-market loans or below-market funding into the costs of its broadband facilities and broadband services. The provisions of this paragraph shall not apply to loans or funding from programs that are intended to support the deployment of broadband facilities or broadband services.

An electric membership corporation that has a broadband affiliate that provides retail broadband services shall:

Not condition the receipt of electricity services upon, nor provide more favorable terms for electricity services in exchange for, persons that receive broadband services from the electric membership corporation or its broadband affiliate;

Have a duty to provide access to the poles, ducts, conduits, and easements of such electric membership corporation to all communications service providers on rates, terms, and conditions that are just, reasonable, and nondiscriminatory;

Not provide its broadband affiliate or any communications service provider any information obtained from other communications service providers in the pole attachment request and approval process, including without limitation the requested locations for pole attachments, the locations of the customers to be served, or any identifying information regarding such customers;

When such electric membership corporation is assisting a customer or potential customer seeking to initiate electricity services and there is any inquiry or discussion regarding the availability of retail broadband services, in the course of the same discussion or transaction in which such assistance is being provided, inform such customer or potential customer of other providers offering broadband services in such customer’s area based on any service map of a provider of broadband services or similar resource maintained by any department of the state or federal government and inform such customer or potential customer that broadband services may be obtained from such electric membership corporation’s broadband affiliate or such other providers of broadband services. Such information shall be provided only with regard to other providers of broadband services that have notified the electric membership corporation’s broadband affiliate, in writing and in a commercially reasonable manner, that such provider of broadband services is able and willing to provide broadband services to customers located within all or a portion of the electric membership corporation’s designated electricity service territory; and

Develop and maintain a cost allocation manual, to be approved by the commission, describing the electric membership corporation’s methods of cost allocation and such other information and policies reasonably required to ensure compliance with this article. Such manual shall:

Establish rules for the pricing of transactions between an electric membership corporation and its gas affiliates and broadband affiliates, as applicable, including the transfer of assets between such electric membership corporation and its gas affiliates and broadband affiliates;

Require the electric membership corporation and its gas affiliates and broadband affiliates, as applicable, to maintain separate books of accounts and records which shall be subject to inspection to confirm compliance with this article and the cost allocation manual; and

Require that all services that an electric membership corporation provides to its gas affiliates and broadband affiliates, as applicable, be provided at the same rates and on the same terms and conditions as any other similarly situated retail customer or communications service provider. Any such services provided to any communications service provider shall be on a strictly confidential basis, such that the electric membership corporation does not share information regarding any communications service provider with any other communications service provider, including a broadband affiliate.

The commission shall have jurisdiction over each broadband affiliate and each electric membership corporation that has a broadband affiliate that provides retail broadband services to enforce compliance within the provisions of this Code section. The commission shall provide for an expedited adjudication of any complaint as to a failure to comply with this Code section and may engage an administrative law judge for purposes of such adjudication.

Except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section, this Code section shall only apply to electric membership corporations with a broadband affiliate offering retail broadband services.

As to an electric membership corporation that was offering retail broadband services on or before January 1, 2019, whether directly through the electric membership corporation or indirectly through a broadband affiliate, this Code section shall only apply to retail broadband services offered on or after January 1, 2021, and such electric membership corporation shall have until January 1, 2021, to develop and maintain the cost allocation manual required in paragraph (5) of subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-200.2

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 226, § 3/SB 2.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 26, 2019.

46-3-200.3.
Rights, powers, and benefits to broadband affiliates of electric membership corporations.

Broadband affiliates shall have all of the rights, powers, and benefits granted to other entities under the provisions of Title 14 and shall not be subject to any restrictions contained in this article, except that a broadband affiliate shall:

Only serve the purposes of developing, providing, furnishing, or promoting broadband facilities and broadband services, or a combination of such purposes; and

Be subject to the provisions of Code Section 46-3-200.2.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-200.3

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 226, § 3/SB 2.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 26, 2019.

46-3-200.4.
Rates, terms, and conditions for pole attachments between communications service providers and electric membership corporations and their broadband affiliates.

As used in this Code section, the term:

“Attachment” means the connection or fastening of a wire or cable to a utility pole.

“Broadband services” shall have the same meaning as provided for the term “broadband service” in Code Section 46-5-221.

“Communications service provider” means a provider of cable service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 522(6), telecommunications service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153(53), or information service as defined in 47 U.S.C. Section 153(24), as each such term existed on January 1, 2020.

“Utility pole” means a pole or similar structure that is used in whole or in part for electric distribution by an electric membership corporation or an affiliate thereof.

In order to promote the deployment of broadband services in this state, and except as required by the Tennessee Valley Authority for its distributors in this state, on and after July 1, 2021, the rates, fees, terms, conditions, and specifications in any pole attachment agreement entered into by a communications service provider and an electric membership corporation shall be as determined by the commission, except as provided in subsection (e) of this Code section. Such determination shall be made after consideration of what is just, reasonable, nondiscriminatory, and commercially reasonable. The commission shall by rules and regulations prescribe the process for making such a determination providing all interested parties the opportunity to be heard and to present evidence. On or before January 1, 2021, the commission shall publish the pole attachment rates, fees, terms, conditions, and specifications.

The commission shall have jurisdiction over all electric membership corporations to enforce compliance within the provisions of this Code section. The commission shall provide for an expedited adjudication of any complaint as to a failure to comply with this Code section and may engage an administrative law judge for purposes of such adjudication.

Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection (b) of this Code section, any existing agreement between a communications service provider and an electric membership corporation shall remain in effect until the date of its natural expiration or lawful termination.

Any electric membership corporation and communications service provider may enter into a mutual agreement as to the rates, fees, terms, conditions, and specifications for attachments to utility poles by communications service providers that differ from those provided for in subsection (b) of this Code section.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-200.4

, enacted by Ga. L. 2020, p. 814, § 2/HB 244.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective January 1, 2021.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2020, p. 814, § 1/HB 244, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Georgia Broadband Opportunity Act.’”

Ga. L. 2020, p. 814, § 2/HB 244, repealed former Code Section 46-3-200.4, pertaining to rates, terms, and conditions for pole attachments between communications service providers and electric membership corporations and their broadband affiliates, and enacted the present Code section. The former Code section was based on Ga. L. 2019, p. 226, § 3/SB 2.

46-3-201.
Existence of electric membership corporations under articles of incorporation; duration of corporations; powers of corporations generally.

Subject to any limitations provided in this article, or in any other law, and consistent with the purposes set forth in this article, each electric membership corporation:

Shall exist under articles of incorporation;

Shall have perpetual duration unless a limited period of duration is stated in its articles of incorporation; provided, however, that each electric membership corporation existing or continuing to operate as an electric membership corporation after the expiration of the period of duration stated in its articles of incorporation or any renewal thereof, on July 1, 1981, shall have perpetual duration unless its articles of incorporation are amended under this article to provide for a limited period of duration. The existence of any such electric membership corporation whose articles of incorporation were expired on July 1, 1981, shall be deemed to have continued without interruption from the date of such expiration;

Shall have power:

To cease its corporate activities and surrender its corporate franchise;

To renew or revive its corporate existence in case a limited period of duration is fixed in its articles of incorporation; and

To sue and be sued and to complain and defend in all courts and to participate in any judicial, administrative, arbitrative, or other action or proceeding.

Subject to any limitations provided in this article or in any other law, and consistent with the purposes set forth in this article, each electric membership corporation shall have power:

To conduct its business, carry on its operations, have offices, and exercise its powers granted by this article at any location within or outside of this state;

To make and alter bylaws, not inconsistent with its articles of incorporation or with the laws of this state, for the administration and regulation of the affairs of the electric membership corporation;

To elect, appoint, or hire officers, employees, and other agents of the electric membership corporation; to define their duties; and to fix their compensation and the compensation of directors;

To have a corporate seal which may be altered at pleasure and to use the seal by causing it or a facsimile thereof to be impressed or affixed or in any other manner reproduced;

To purchase; take; receive by gift, will, or otherwise; lease; or otherwise acquire, own, hold, improve, use, and otherwise deal in and with real or personal property or any interest therein, wherever situated;

To sell, convey, lease, exchange, transfer, and otherwise dispose of all or any part of its property and assets or any interest therein, wherever situated;

To generate, manufacture, purchase, acquire, and accumulate electricity, and to transmit, distribute, sell, furnish, and dispose of such electricity;

To assist its members in any manner in the efficient and economical use of energy, including, but not limited to, the installation of wiring, insulation, electrical machinery, supplies, apparatus, and equipment of any and all kinds or character;

To acquire, own, hold, use, exercise, and, to the extent permitted by law, sell, mortgage, pledge, hypothecate, and in any manner dispose of franchises, rights, privileges, licenses, rights of way, and easements necessary, useful, or appropriate. Any such electric membership corporation shall have the right to acquire rights of way, easements, and all interests in realty necessary and appropriate to effectuate the purposes of such electric membership corporation by condemnation under the same procedure and terms as provided by Title 22 and any other law of this state which provides a method or procedure for the condemnation of property for public purposes by all persons or corporations having the privilege of exercising the right of eminent domain;

In connection with the acquisition, construction, improvement, operation, or maintenance of its lines, to use any highway or any right of way, easement, or other similar property right owned or held by the state or any political subdivision thereof, subject to reasonable rules and regulations as to safety as may be promulgated by the State Transportation Board or subject to such reasonable terms and conditions as the governing body of such political subdivision shall determine;

To make any and all contracts necessary or convenient for the exercise of the powers granted in this article, including, but not limited to, contracts with any person, federal agency, or municipality for the purchase or sale of energy; and, in connection with any such contract, to stipulate and agree to such covenants, terms, and conditions as the board of directors may deem appropriate, including, but not limited to, covenants, terms, and conditions with respect to resale rates, financial and accounting methods, services, operation and maintenance practices, and the manner of disposing of the revenues of the system operated and maintained by the electric membership corporation;

To make and enter into contracts of guaranty, whether or not the electric membership corporation has a direct interest in the subject matter of the contract with respect to which it acts as guarantor or surety;

To incur obligations and liabilities, borrow money, issue its notes, bonds, and other obligations, and to execute and deliver any one or more mortgages, deeds of trust, or deeds to secure debt covering, or to create by other means a security interest in, any or all of the real or personal property, assets, rights, privileges, licenses, franchises, and permits of the electric membership corporation or any interest therein, as well as the revenues therefrom, whether acquired or to be acquired, and wherever situated, for the purpose of securing the payment or performance of any one or more contracts, notes, bonds, or other obligations of the electric membership corporation;

To purchase, take, receive, subscribe for, or otherwise acquire; to own, hold, vote, use, or employ; to sell, lend, or otherwise dispose of; to mortgage, pledge, create a security interest in, or otherwise encumber; and otherwise to use and deal in and with shares or other interests in or obligations of electric membership corporations or other domestic or foreign corporations, whether for profit or not, associations, partnerships, or individuals, or direct or indirect obligations of the United States or of any other government, state, territory, governmental district, or municipality or any instrumentality thereof;

To form or acquire the control of other electric membership corporations, foreign electric cooperatives, and other corporations, whether domestic or foreign;

To participate with any other person or persons in any corporation, partnership, transaction, arrangement, operation, organization, or venture, even if such participation involves sharing of control with or delegation of control to others;

To lend money, invest and reinvest its funds, and take and hold real and personal property as security for the payment of funds so loaned or invested;

To make donations, irrespective of corporate benefit, for the public welfare or for community fund, hospital, charitable, scientific, educational, civic, or similar purposes, and in time of war or other national emergency in aid of the national effort with respect thereto;

At the request or direction of the United States government or any agency thereof, to transact any lawful business in time of war or national emergency or in aid of national defense;

To procure for its benefit insurance on the life of any of its directors, officers, or employees or any other person whose death might cause financial loss to the electric membership corporation;

To reimburse and indemnify litigation expenses of directors, officers, and employees and to purchase and maintain liability insurance for their benefit;

To purchase and otherwise acquire and dispose of its own securities;

To pay pensions and establish and carry out pension, savings, thrift, and other retirement, incentive, and benefit plans, trusts, and provisions for any or all of its directors, officers, and employees;

To fix, regulate, and collect rates, fees, rents, or other charges for electric energy and any other facilities, supplies, equipment, or services furnished by the electric membership corporation;

To assist any other electric membership corporation in the execution of its purposes and powers under this article; and

To have and exercise all powers necessary or convenient to effect any or all of the purposes for which the electric membership corporation is organized.

It shall not be necessary to set forth in the articles of incorporation any of the powers enumerated in this Code section.

The articles of incorporation may limit or expand the powers conferred by subsection (b) of this Code section in any manner not inconsistent with any other provisions of this article or any other law or with the purposes of electric membership corporations.

History.

Ga. L. 1937, p. 644, § 4; Ga. L. 1939, p. 312, § 2; Ga. L. 1957, p. 604, §§ 1, 2; Ga. L. 1980, p. 72, § 1; Code 1933, § 34C-202, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1; Ga. L. 1984, p. 22, § 46.

Law reviews.

For survey article on local government law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 285 (2007).

For survey article on zoning and land use law, see 59 Mercer L. Rev. 493 (2007).

46-3-202.
Defense of ultra vires.

No act of an electric membership corporation and no conveyance or transfer of real or personal property to or by an electric membership corporation shall be invalid by reason of the fact that the electric membership corporation was without capacity or power to do such act or to make or receive such conveyance or transfer; but such lack of capacity or power may be asserted:

In an action by a member or director against the electric membership corporation to enjoin the doing of any act or the transfer of real or personal property by or to the electric membership corporation, unless the plaintiff has assented to the act or transfer in question or in bringing the action is acting in collusion with officials of the electric membership corporation. If the unauthorized act or transfer sought to be enjoined is being or is to be performed or made pursuant to any contract to which the electric membership corporation is a party, the court may, if all the parties to the contract are parties to the action and if it deems the same to be equitable, set aside and enjoin the performance of such contract and in so doing may allow to the electric membership corporation or to the other parties to the contract, as the case may be, compensation for the loss or damage sustained by either of them which may result from the action of the court in setting aside and enjoining the performance of such contracts; but anticipated profits to be derived from the performance of the contract shall not be awarded by the court as a loss or damage sustained;

In an action by the electric membership corporation, whether acting directly or through a receiver, trustee, or other legal representative or through members in a representative action, against an incumbent or former officer or director of the electric membership corporation for loss or damage due to his unauthorized act; or

In an action by the Attorney General to dissolve the electric membership corporation or in an action by the Attorney General to enjoin the electric membership corporation from the transaction of unauthorized business.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-203, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-203.
Unauthorized assumption of corporate powers.

All persons who assume to act as an electric membership corporation before the Secretary of State has issued the certificate of incorporation to the incorporator or incorporators or his or their attorney shall be jointly and severally liable for all debts and liabilities incurred or arising as a result thereof.

History.

Code 1933, § 34C-204, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-204.
Limitations as to actions growing out of acquisition of rights of way, easements, or occupation of lands of others; damages recoverable.

All rights of action accruing against any electric membership corporation growing out of the acquisition of rights of way or easements or the occupying of lands of others by such electric membership corporations shall be barred at the end of 12 months from the date of the accrual of such cause of action; and in cases where any such electric membership corporation is in possession of the lands of others without having condemned the property as provided, and such electric membership corporation is using any such land of another for any of the purposes for which an electric membership corporation may be created under this article, and the owners of the land took no legal steps to prevent the occupation of the land by the electric membership corporation, the rights of the owner of the land shall be limited to whatever damages may have been caused to his realty by such occupation; and this limitation shall apply to all persons whether sui juris or not.

History.

Ga. L. 1939, p. 312, § 3; Code 1933, § 34C-205, enacted by Ga. L. 1981, p. 1587, § 1.

46-3-205.
Use of easements.

The General Assembly finds that electric membership corporations providing broadband services should be permitted to use existing electric easements to provide or expand access to broadband services. The General Assembly also finds that utilizing existing electric easements to provide broadband services, without the placement of additional poles or other ground based structures, does not change the physical use of the easement, interfere with or impair any vested rights of the owner or occupier of the real property subject to the electric easement, or place any additional burden on the property interests of such owner or occupier. Consequently, the installation and operation of broadband services within any electric easement are merely changes in the manner or degree of the granted use as appropriate to accommodate a new technology and, absent any applicable express prohibition contained in the instrument conveying or granting the electric easement, shall be deemed as a matter of law to be a permitted use within the scope of every electric easement.

Subject to compliance with any express prohibitions in an electric easement, the owner of an electric easement may use an electric easement to install, maintain, lease, and operate broadband services without incurring liability to the owner or occupant of the real property subject to the electric easement or paying additional compensation to the owner or occupant of the real property subject to the electric easement, so long as no additional poles or other ground based structures are installed; provided, however, that any electric utility owning an electric easement may assess fees and charges and impose reasonable conditions on the use of its facilities within an electric easement for the purpose of providing or supporting broadband services.

Nothing in this Code section shall in any way affect, abrogate, or eliminate the obligation of an owner of an electric easement that is located on, along, over, across, or under property owned or controlled by a railroad company or state agency to comply with the application, review, safety, and permit requirements of such railroad company or state agency for projects of the nature contemplated by this Code section. Such requirements may include, but are not limited to, insurance coverage and responsibility of the owner of an electric easement to pay for costs incurred by a railroad company or state agency related to such requirements, such as safety measures and engineering review costs. For purposes of this subsection, the term “state agency” means any department, division, board, bureau, commission, or other agency of the state government or any state authority.

History.

Code 1981, §

46-3-205

, enacted by Ga. L. 2019, p. 226, § 4/SB 2; Ga. L. 2020, p. 485, § 1/SB 370.

Effective date. —

This Code section became effective April 26, 2019.

The 2020 amendment,

effective January 1, 2021, added subsection (c).